District of Columbia statutes.
8-403.04

Reduced-risk pesticides and methods of pest control.

(a)

If a pesticide designated by the Mayor as reduced-risk pursuant to subsection (b) of this subsection is applied, the operator shall indicate on the customer notice provided in § 8-403.01(a)(9) that the customer has selected a reduced-risk pesticide.

(b)

Within 6 months of June 5, 2008, the Mayor shall approve a list of reduced-risk pesticides and methods of pest control.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 4d
as added June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-168, § 2, 55 DCR 5180